Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.065

Charitable organizations and commercial fund-raisers—Registration required—Public record—Registration not endorsement.

(1) All charitable organizations and commercial fund-raisers must register with the secretary prior to conducting any solicitations.

(2) Failure to register as required by this chapter is a violation of this chapter.

(3) Information provided to the secretary pursuant to this chapter is a public record except as provided by law. Social security numbers and financial account numbers are not public information.

(4) Registration must not be considered or be represented as an endorsement by the secretary or the state of Washington.

[ 2011 c 199 s 5; 1993 c 471 s 2; 1986 c 230 s 3; 1983 c 265 s 4.]